Utah statutes.
63A-9-802.   State surplus property program -- Participation by institutions of higher education.

The Board of Regents shall:

(1)  implement a policy requiring each institution of higher education to submit to the division a listing of surplus property available for sale outside the institution, at least 15 days prior to the intended sale date;

(2)  supervise and assist compliance by the institutions of higher education with the requirement of this part; and

(3)  encourage institutions of higher education to acquire federal surplus property from the division to reduce expenditures.

